Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1712
Farm labor contractor; applicant for license; prohibited acts.

A farm labor contractor or an applicant for a farm labor contractor license shall not:

(1) Make any misrepresentation, false statement, or willful concealment in the application for a license or in his or her dealing with workers;

(2) Solicit or induce or cause to be solicited or induced the violation of an existing contract of employment;

(3) Assist a person to act in violation of the Farm Labor Contractors Act; and

(4) By any force, intimidation, or threat, including threat of deportation, induce any worker employed or in a subcontracting relationship to the farm labor contractor to give up any part of the compensation to which the worker is entitled under the contract of employment or under federal or state wage laws.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 12.